Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-272
Hearing; requested within thirty days; effect.

If a hearing is requested under sections 79-268 and 79-269 more than five school days but not more than thirty calendar days following the actual receipt of written notice, the hearing shall be held but the imposed punishment shall continue in effect pending final determination.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 16;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,185;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 76.